Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.670

Washington award for vocational excellence—Grants—Definitions.

(1) Recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550, who receive the award after June 30, 1994, may receive a grant, if funds are available. The grant shall be used to attend a postsecondary institution located in the state of Washington. Recipients may attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or an independent college or university, or a licensed private vocational school. The office shall distribute grants to eligible students under this section from moneys appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall not exceed, on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident, undergraduate tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the state-funded research universities. In consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating board, the office shall establish procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the students.

(2) To qualify for the grant, recipients shall enter the postsecondary institution within three years of high school graduation and maintain a minimum grade point average at the institution equivalent to 3.00, or, at a technical college, an above average rating. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years of grants for undergraduate study and may transfer among in-state eligible postsecondary institutions during that period and continue to receive the grant.

(3) No grant may be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree in theology.

(4) As used in this section, "independent college or university" means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the Northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the *higher education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under this section.

(5) As used in this section, "licensed private vocational school" means a private postsecondary institution, located in the state, licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, and offering postsecondary education in order to prepare persons for a vocation or profession, as defined in RCW 28C.10.020(7).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 124; 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 8. Formerly RCW 28B.80.272.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board ("board") was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.